Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.054

Collective bargaining agreements—Grievance procedure—Applicability of RCW 41.56.037—Effective dates—Certain payroll deductions prohibited.

(1) The parties to a collective bargaining agreement must reduce the agreement to writing and both execute it.

(2) Except as provided in this chapter, a collective bargaining agreement must contain provisions that provide for a grievance procedure of all disputes arising over the interpretation or application of the collective bargaining agreement and that is valid and enforceable under its terms when entered into in accordance with this chapter.

(3) RCW 41.56.037 applies to this chapter.

(4)(a) If a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee organization representing the same bargaining units, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination of the previous collective bargaining agreement, and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

(b) If a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative representing different bargaining units, the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of whichever previous collective bargaining agreement covering one or more of the units terminated first, and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of legislative employees may not enter into a collective bargaining agreement that requires the employer to deduct, from the salary or wages of an employee, contributions for payments for political action committees sponsored by employee organizations with legislative employees as members.

[ 2024 c 333 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.